Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-943
Supplemental retirement benefit; not applicable; when.

Section 79-942 shall not apply to any retired person who receives a service annuity less than the amount provided in sections 79-933 and 79-938.

Laws 1980, LB 228, § 4;

Laws 1981, LB 141, § 3;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-1561;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 578.